Hawaii statutes.
§520A-4 Liability of owner limited.
(a) Except as specifically recognized by or provided in section 520A-6, an
owner of land who either directly or indirectly invites or permits without
charge any person to use the property for control or eradication of invasive
species does not:

(1) Extend any assurance that the premises are safe
for any purpose;

(2) Confer upon the person the legal status of an
invitee or licensee to whom a duty of care is owed;

(3) Assume responsibility for, or incur liability for,
any injury to any person or property caused by an act of omission or commission
of such persons; and

(4) Assume responsibility for, or incur liability
for, any injury to any person or persons who enter the premises in response to
an injured person who entered the premises to control or eradicate invasive
species.

(b) An owner of land who is required or
compelled to provide access or parking for such access through or across the
owner's property because of state or county land use, zoning, or planning law,
ordinance, rule, ruling, or order, to reach property subject to control or
eradication of invasive species, shall be afforded the same protection as to
such access, including parking for such access, as an owner of land who invites
or permits any person to use that owner's property for control or eradication
of invasive species under subsection (a). [L 2003, c 86, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next